Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 27. Incentive for Energy Independence Act

154.27-010.
Definitions for subchapter.

As used in this subchapter:

“Activation date” means the date on which an approved company begins incurring recoverable costs or engaging in recoverable activity pursuant to the tax incentive agreement. The activation date shall be set forth in the tax incentive agreement and shall be a date within five (5) years of the date of final approval of the tax incentive agreement. The authority may extend the five (5) year period to no more than seven (7) years upon written application for an extension by the approved company. To implement the activation date, the approved company shall notify the authority of its intent to activate the tax incentives authorized in the tax incentive agreement. The activation date shall apply to all incentives included in the tax incentive agreement regardless of whether the approved company has met the requirements to receive all incentives at that time. If the approved company does not implement the activation date before the date established in the tax incentive agreement, the activation date shall be the date established in the tax incentive agreement;

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.22-010;

“Alternative fuel facility” means a facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 30, 2007, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 30, 2007, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, primarily produces for sale alternative transportation fuels. For a retrofit of an existing facility, the new modification or addition within the facility shall primarily produce alternative transportation fuel for sale.
(3) (a)

“Alternative fuel facility” means a facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 30, 2007, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 30, 2007, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, primarily produces for sale alternative transportation fuels. For a retrofit of an existing facility, the new modification or addition within the facility shall primarily produce alternative transportation fuel for sale.

The alternative fuel facility may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary purpose for which the facility is constructed, retrofitted, or upgraded, and the primary function of the facility remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;

“Alternative transportation fuels” has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;

“Approved company” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, registered limited liability partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity approved for incentives for an eligible project;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority established by KRS 154.20-010;

“Base amount” means the tons of coal, thousand (1000) cubic foot units (Mcf) of natural gas, or gallons of natural gas liquids purchased and used or severed and used by the approved company as feedstock for an eligible project during the twelve (12) months prior to the month in which the approved company first begins receiving incentives under KRS 143.024 or 143A.025, and 154.27-060, that were subject to the tax imposed by KRS 143.020 or 143A.020;

“Blockchain technology” or “blockchain” means shared or distributed data structures or digital ledgers governed by consensus protocols and maintained by peer-to-peer networks that:

Store digital transactions; and

Verify and secure transactions cryptographically;

“Biomass resources” has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;

“Capital investment” means:
(10) (a)

“Capital investment” means:

Obligations incurred for labor and to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, upgrading, or retrofitting of an eligible project;

The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incident thereto, including recording fees;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, upgrading, or retrofitting of an eligible project which is not paid by the contractor or otherwise provided;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimates, plans, specifications, preliminary investigations, supervision of construction, and the performance of all the duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, upgrading, or retrofitting of an eligible project;

All costs required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, upgrading, or retrofitting of an eligible project; and

All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this subsection.

“Capital investment” does not include costs described in paragraph (a) of this subsection that are paid for with funds received from the federal government or that are reimbursed by the federal government;

“Carbon capture ready” means planning for or anticipating capture of carbon dioxide in a manner to facilitate continued operation of the facility in compliance with applicable federal requirements;

“Carbon dioxide transmission pipeline” means the in-state portion of a pipeline, including appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is used exclusively for the purpose of transporting carbon dioxide to a point of sale, storage, or other carbon management applications;

“Center for Applied Energy Research” means the University of Kentucky Center for Applied Energy Research;

“Commercial mining of cryptocurrency” means the process through which blockchain technology is used to mine cryptocurrency at a cryptocurrency facility, and includes the process through which blockchain transactions are verified and accepted by adding the transactions to a blockchain ledger, which involves solving complex mathematical cryptographic problems associated with a block containing transaction data;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Construction period” means the period beginning with the activation date of the eligible project and ending on a date set forth in the tax incentive agreement, which shall be no later than five (5) years from the activation date;

“Consensus protocol” means a set of rules and procedures that control how and when blockchain transactions are verified, validated, recorded, and recognized;

“Cryptocurrency” means a type of virtual currency that utilizes blockchain technology and that:

Can be digitally traded between users; or

Can be converted or exchanged for legal tender;

“Cryptocurrency facility” means a facility located in the Commonwealth that is utilized in the commercial mining of cryptocurrency or in hosting persons engaged in the commercial mining of cryptocurrency through utilization of the facility’s infrastructure, including servers and network hardware powered by Internet bandwidth, electricity, and other services generally required for such mining operations;

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Eligible project” means:

An alternative fuel facility or a gasification facility meeting the investment requirements of KRS 154.27-020;

An energy-efficient alternative fuel facility meeting the investment requirements of KRS 154.27-020;

A renewable energy facility meeting the investment requirements of KRS 154.27-020;

A carbon dioxide transmission pipeline meeting the investment requirements of KRS 154.27-020; or

A cryptocurrency facility meeting the investment requirements of KRS 154.27-020;

“Energy-efficient alternative fuel facility” means a facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 30, 2010, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 30, 2010, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, will produce for sale energy-efficient alternative fuels. For a retrofit of an existing facility, the new modification or addition within the facility shall produce for sale energy-efficient alternative fuels;

“Energy-efficient alternative fuels” means homogeneous fuels that:

Are produced from processes designed to densify feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resources; and

Have an energy content that is greater than the feedstock coal, waste coal, or biomass resource;

“Estimated labor component” means the projected percentage of the total capital investment attributable to labor;

“Facility” means a single location within the Commonwealth at which machinery and equipment are used:
(25) (a)

“Facility” means a single location within the Commonwealth at which machinery and equipment are used:

In a manufacturing process that transforms raw materials into a product with commercial value; or

In the commercial mining of cryptocurrency or in hosting persons engaged in the commercial mining of cryptocurrency.

The facility shall include the physical plant structure where the manufacturing process occurs or where the commercial mining of cryptocurrency occurs and machinery and equipment within the physical plant structure.

The facility may include:

On-site machinery and equipment used exclusively for processing coal or other raw materials for use in the manufacturing process at the facility;

For an alternative fuel facility or gasification facility, on-site power station operations, if those operations are primarily used to produce electricity for the facility;

On-site refining operations, if those operations are used exclusively to refine and blend fuels produced by the facility; and

The in-state portion of a pipeline, including appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, if the exclusive purpose of the pipeline is to transport carbon dioxide from the facility to a point of sale, storage, or other carbon management applications.

“Facility” shall not include any mining operations, or drilling and production operations for natural gas, unless such coal, natural resource, or natural gas operations are being used for purposes of, or are hosting, the commercial mining of cryptocurrency, in which case such operations shall be a facility;

“Gasification process” means a process that converts any carbon-containing material into a synthesis gas composed primarily of carbon monoxide and hydrogen;

“Gasification facility” means a facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 30, 2007, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 30, 2007, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, primarily produces for sale:
(27) (a)

“Gasification facility” means a facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 30, 2007, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 30, 2007, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, primarily produces for sale:

Alternative transportation fuels;

Synthetic natural gas;

Chemicals;

Chemical feedstocks; or

Liquid fuels;

The gasification facility may produce electricity as a by-product if the primary purpose for which the facility is constructed, retrofitted, or upgraded, and the primary function of the facility remains the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels, synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical feedstocks, or liquid fuels;

“Kentucky gross profits” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;

“Kentucky gross receipts” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;

“Post-construction incentives” means the incentives available under KRS 154.27-060 and 154.27-080;

“Renewable energy facility” means a facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 30, 2007, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded after August 30, 2007, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, utilizes:

Wind power, biomass resources, landfill methane gas, hydropower, or other similar renewable resources to generate electricity in excess of one (1) megawatt for sale to unrelated entities; or

Solar power to generate electricity in excess of fifty (50) kilowatts for sale to unrelated entities.

“Resident” has the same meaning as in KRS 141.010;

“Retrofit” means a modification or addition to an existing facility that results in the production of a new and different product or services or uses a new or different process to produce the same product or services at the facility.
(33) (a)

“Retrofit” means a modification or addition to an existing facility that results in the production of a new and different product or services or uses a new or different process to produce the same product or services at the facility.

Modifications or additions to a facility that maintain, restore, mend, or repair a facility shall not be considered a retrofit of the facility, and shall not be considered part of the capital investment if undertaken at the same time as a retrofit;

“Synthetic natural gas” has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;

“Tax incentive agreement” means an agreement entered into in accordance with KRS 154.27-040;

“Termination date” means a date established by the tax incentive agreement that is no more than twenty-five (25) years from the activation date; and

“Upgrade” means an investment in an existing facility that results in an increase in the productivity of the facility. Increased productivity shall be measured in relation to the type of products or services that are required to be produced or performed by that facility to be an eligible project.

from coal, waste coal, coal-processing waste, or biomass resources, through a gasification process. For a retrofit of an existing facility, the new modification or addition within the facility shall primarily produce one (1) or more of the products set forth in this paragraph.

For a retrofit of an existing facility, the modification or addition shall primarily result in the production of electricity as described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection;

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1, effective August 30, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 199, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 139, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 82, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 141, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

154.27-020.
Short title — Legislative findings — Purpose of subchapter — Incentives.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Incentives for Energy-related Business Act.”

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to induce the location of innovative energy-related businesses in the Commonwealth in order to advance the public purposes of achieving energy independence, creating new and advanced technologies, creating new jobs and new investment, and creating new sources of tax revenues that but for the inducements to be offered by the authority to approved companies would not exist.

The purpose of this subchapter is to assist the Commonwealth in moving to the forefront of national efforts to achieve energy independence by reducing the Commonwealth’s reliance on imported energy resources, and to become a national leader in emerging industries which use substantial amounts of energy. The provisions of this subchapter seek to accomplish this purpose by providing incentives for companies that, in a carbon capture ready manner, construct, retrofit, or upgrade facilities for the purpose of:

Increasing the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;

Increasing the production and sale of synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical feedstocks, or liquid fuels, from coal, biomass resources, or waste coal through a gasification process;

Increasing the production and sale of energy-efficient alternative fuels;

Generating electricity for sale through alternative methods such as solar power, wind power, biomass resources, landfill methane gas, hydropower, or other similar renewable resources; or

Increasing the usage of electricity in areas which have an abundant supply due to the loss of manufacturing businesses across the state.

To qualify for the incentives provided in this subchapter, the following requirements shall be met:

For an alternative fuel facility or gasification facility that uses oil shale, tar sands, or coal as the primary feedstock, the minimum capital investment shall be one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000);

For an alternative fuel facility or gasification facility that uses biomass resources as the primary feedstock, the minimum capital investment shall be twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000);

For an energy-efficient alternative fuel facility, the minimum capital investment shall be twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000);

For an alternative fuel facility located in Kentucky that is newly constructed on or after August 1, 2010, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 1, 2010, and that, after the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, primarily produces for sale alternative transportation fuels using natural gas or natural gas liquids as the primary feedstock, the minimum capital investment shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000); provided that the authority may approve a maximum of five (5) projects that meet the requirements of this paragraph;

For a renewable energy facility, the minimum capital investment shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000);

For a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline, the minimum capital investment shall be fifty million dollars ($50,000,000); and

For a cryptocurrency facility, the minimum capital investment shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000).

The incentives under the Incentives for Energy-related Business Act are as follows:

An advance disbursement of post-construction incentives for which an approved company has been approved, the maximum amount of which is based upon the estimated labor component of the total capital investment of the eligible project, and the utilization of Kentucky residents during the construction period as set forth in KRS 154.27-090;

Sales and use tax incentives of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the taxes paid on purchases of tangible personal property made to construct, retrofit, or upgrade an eligible project, including commercial cryptocurrency mining equipment at a facility, as set forth in KRS 139.517 and 154.27-070;

Up to eighty percent (80%) of the severance taxes paid on the purchase or severance of:

Coal that is subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143.020 and that is specifically used by an alternative fuel facility, energy-efficient alternative fuel facility, or a gasification facility as feedstock for an eligible project, as set forth in KRS 143.024 and 154.27-060; or

Natural gas or natural gas liquids that are subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143A.020 and that are specifically used in an alternative fuel facility described in subsection (4)(d) of this section as feedstock for an eligible project, as set forth in KRS 143A.025 and 154.27-060;

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky income tax imposed under KRS 141.040 or 141.020, and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising from the eligible project, as set forth in KRS 141.421 and 154.27-080; and

Authorization for the approved company to impose a wage assessment of up to four percent (4%) of the gross wages of each employee subject to the Kentucky income tax:

Whose job was created as a result of the eligible project;

Who is employed by the approved company to work at the facility; and

Who is on the payroll of the approved company or an affiliate of the approved company;

The maximum recovery from all incentives approved under this subchapter for an eligible project shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the capital investment in the eligible project.

The incentives available to an approved company shall be negotiated with and approved by the authority.

If a newly constructed facility that qualifies for incentives under this subchapter is later upgraded or retrofitted in a manner that would qualify for incentives under this subchapter, the retrofit or upgrade shall be a separate eligible project, and the minimum investment requirements and carbon capture readiness requirements, if required, shall be met for the retrofit or upgrade to qualify for incentives under this subchapter.

The General Assembly finds that the authorities granted by this subchapter are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended.

as set forth in KRS 154.27-080.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2, effective August 30, 2007; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 101, effective June 26, 2009; 2010, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 139, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 82, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 141, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

154.27-030.
Application for incentives — Review — Approval — Approval of projects involving new, retrofitted, or upgraded alternative fuel facilities.

A company with an eligible project may submit an application for incentives to the authority prior to making any capital investment it will seek to recover.

The application shall include:

The name of the applicant and identification of any affiliates of the applicant;

The type of eligible project;

A description of the location;

A full description of the eligible project scope, including but not limited to:

A list and the status of permits, certificates, or approvals required by the federal government, the Commonwealth, or any jurisdiction within the Commonwealth;

A description of the carbon capture readiness of the facility, if the proposed eligible project is an alternative fuel facility or a gasification facility;

Any feasibility studies, including supporting documents;

Anticipated sources of eligible project funding;

The total anticipated capital investment and the time period over which the capital investment will occur;

The proposed feedstock and the estimated volume of feedstock use per year;

A description of the proposed products or services to be produced by the facility and the process that will be used to produce the products;

The planned capacity of the facility after construction, retrofit, or upgrade;

The estimated output of the facility upon completion; and

A plan for and description of how the company will employ Kentucky residents at the facility and how the company will ensure, to the extent possible, that workers employed during construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the facility are Kentucky residents. The plan shall include projected numbers;

Identification of the specific incentives sought;

Payment of any applicable application fees required by the authority to offset reasonable costs of reviewing and processing the application; and

Other information as required by the authority.

The authority shall forward the application to the Department of Revenue and the Office of Energy Policy, if applicable, for review and comment with a date by which comments shall be provided back to the authority. The authority may forward the application to the Center for Applied Energy Research for review and comment as well.

The authority shall review the application and shall verify that:
(4) (a)

The authority shall review the application and shall verify that:

The applicant has met all of the statutory and regulatory requirements established by this subchapter and regulations promulgated thereunder;

The applicant has secured or is in the process of securing all necessary permits, certificates, or approvals required by the federal government, the Commonwealth, or any jurisdiction within the Commonwealth;

The proposed facility is carbon capture ready, if the proposed facility is an alternative fuel facility or gasification facility;

The company has a plan that includes a projected number of Kentucky residents that will be employed during the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the facility and at the facility upon completion; and

Any other requirements established by the authority.

The Department of Revenue and the Office of Energy Policy, if applicable, shall review the application and shall verify that the company seeking approval and all affiliate companies are in good standing with the department.

The authority may engage the services of outside consultants to assist in the review of the application. Costs associated with the engagement of outside consultants shall be borne by the applicant.

Upon the earlier of:
(5) (a)

Upon the earlier of:

The receipt of comments and recommendations from the Office of Energy Policy, the Department of Revenue, and the Center for Applied Energy Research, if applicable; or

The expiration of the time period established by the authority for receiving comments pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

Preliminary approval shall be based upon representations of the applicant in the application and attachments as well as other information submitted with the application. The authority shall make a finding that, based upon the applicant’s representations, the project appears to be eligible for incentives pursuant to this subchapter.

Prior to final approval:

The applicant shall:

Provide all supportive data requested by the authority;

Secure all required permits or take appropriate steps to do so; and

Cooperate with the authority to obtain opinions or recommendations from any outside consultants; and

The authority shall, in consultation with the Office of Energy Policy or any other entity, verify the representations of the applicant.

A preliminarily approved company seeking an advance disbursement employment incentive under KRS 154.27-090 shall, prior to receiving final approval from the authority, provide to the authority a labor market analysis prepared by a public postsecondary education institution in the Commonwealth with knowledge of the labor market in the region in which the eligible project will be located.
(d) 1.

A preliminarily approved company seeking an advance disbursement employment incentive under KRS 154.27-090 shall, prior to receiving final approval from the authority, provide to the authority a labor market analysis prepared by a public postsecondary education institution in the Commonwealth with knowledge of the labor market in the region in which the eligible project will be located.

The labor market analysis shall evaluate the construction market in the region where the proposed project is to be located and the estimated labor component of the proposed project. The public postsecondary education institution may consult with the Center for Applied Energy Research or the Office of Energy Policy in determining the types of laborers required for the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the eligible facility.

The labor market analysis shall include an estimate of the percentage of the estimated labor component that constitutes wages to be paid to Kentucky residents.

Based upon all of the information available, the authority may, through adoption of a resolution, give its final approval and authorize the execution of a tax incentive agreement to be negotiated pursuant to KRS 154.27-040.

The authority may request any materials and make any inquiries concerning an application that the authority deems necessary.

The actual capital investment that may be recovered and percentages of each incentive that an approved company may receive shall be negotiated between the approved company and the authority and shall not exceed the limitations established by KRS 154.27-020.

The General Assembly recognizes that the incentives offered under this subchapter include the possibility of the release of incentives to approved companies prior to construction completion, and that the release of these incentives may present more risk for the Commonwealth. The authority is directed to consider the possible increased risk to the Commonwealth when negotiating tax incentive agreements that include incentives prior to construction completion, and to incorporate repayment or similar remedy provisions in the tax incentive agreement to the extent the authority determines such provisions are necessary to protect the investment made by the Commonwealth if the approved company fails to comply with the terms of the tax incentive agreement.

The authority and the approved company shall enter into a tax incentive agreement in accordance with KRS 154.27-040.

The authority, with input from the Office of Energy Policy, if applicable, and the Department of Revenue, shall establish additional standards and requirements for the application process through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The standards shall include but not be limited to the creditworthiness of eligible companies and the likelihood of economic success of the economic development project.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the authority may approve a maximum of five (5) projects under this subchapter that involve an alternative fuel facility located in Kentucky that:

Is newly constructed on or after August 1, 2010, or an existing facility located in Kentucky that is retrofitted or upgraded on or after August 1, 2010;

After the new construction, retrofit, or upgrade, primarily produces for sale alternative transportation fuels using natural gas or natural gas liquids as the primary feedstock; and

Has a minimum capital investment of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

the authority may, through the adoption of a resolution, preliminarily approve an applicant for incentives under this subchapter.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3, effective August 30, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 200, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 139, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 29, § 55, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 141, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

154.27-040.
Tax incentive agreement — Required provisions.

The terms and conditions of the tax incentive agreement shall be negotiated between the authority and the approved company. The tax incentive agreement may include one (1) or more of the incentives available under this subchapter or any combination of the incentives as negotiated between the authority and the approved company. The tax incentive agreement shall include but not be limited to the following provisions:

The duties and responsibilities of the parties;

The specific identification of incentives included in the tax incentive agreement, including the permissible percentage recovery under each included incentive;

A detailed description of the eligible project, including an estimate of the capital investment;

If the eligible project is an alternative fuel facility or a gasification facility, a requirement that the facility be carbon capture ready;

The minimum capital investment required and the maximum capital investment that may be recovered;

The time within which the minimum capital investment shall be made;

The activation date and the termination date. The agreement shall commence on the activation date and shall terminate upon the earlier of full receipt of the maximum amount of incentives by the approved company or twenty-five (25) years from the activation date;

A target percentage of the workforce that is Kentucky residents during the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the facility, and at the facility upon completion of construction;

If the wage assessment permitted by KRS 154.27-080 is included, the percentage rate at which the assessment shall be imposed;

If the advance disbursement employment incentive permitted by KRS 154.27-090 is included:

The estimated labor component and the estimated Kentucky resident factor as determined under KRS 154.27-090;

A schedule for the disbursement of funds during the construction period;

A provision that requires a reduction or adjustment in the receipt of post-construction incentives for which the approved company is eligible under the tax incentive agreement until the advance disbursement has been repaid by the approved company;

A provision addressing an alternate payment method if the incentives are not sufficient to repay the advance disbursement; and

A repayment schedule that includes the amount of reduction, the incentives the reduction shall apply to, the amount of interest due, the time period over which the advance disbursement amount shall be recouped, and the amount that shall be recouped in each year. To the extent possible, the repayment schedule shall include uniform incremental payments;

That the approval of the company is not a guarantee of incentives and that actual receipt of the incentives shall be contingent on the approved company filing the required requests for incentives and meeting the requirements established by the tax incentive agreement and by KRS 139.517, 141.421, 143.024, 154.27-060, 154.27-070, 154.27-080, and 154.27-090 that apply to the incentives included;

That the approved company shall provide the authority with documentation of capital expenditures in a manner acceptable to the authority;

Negotiated terms relating to repayment or similar remedies for incentives received prior to the completion of construction if the approved company fails to comply with the terms of the tax incentive agreement;

That, if the authority determines that the approved company has failed to comply with any of its obligations under the tax incentive agreement:

The authority shall have the right to suspend the incentives available to the approved company;

Both the authority and the department shall have the right to pursue any remedy provided under the tax incentive agreement;

The authority may terminate the tax incentive agreement; and

Both the authority and the department may pursue any other remedy at law to which it may be entitled;

A requirement that the authority monitor the tax incentive agreement;

A requirement that the approved company provide to the authority the information necessary to monitor the tax incentive agreement and authorization for the authority to share that information with the Department of Revenue, the Department for Energy Development and Independence, or any other entity the authority determines is necessary for the purposes of monitoring and enforcing the terms of the tax incentive agreement; and

Any other provisions not inconsistent with this subchapter and determined to be necessary or appropriate by the parties to the tax incentive agreement.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4, effective August 30, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 201, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 29, § 56, effective July 14, 2018.

154.27-050.
Release of sales tax incentives under tax incentive agreement — Monitoring, tracking, and reporting requirements.

The department may release to an approved company any sales tax incentives under KRS 139.517 and 154.27-070 after review of the request for incentives required by KRS 139.517 and determination of the amount due regardless of whether the minimum capital investment has been made as required by the tax incentive agreement.

The authority shall monitor all tax incentive agreements. The authority may seek assistance from the Office of Energy Policy, the Department of Revenue, the Center for Applied Energy Research, or other entities or individuals in performing its monitoring functions.

The department shall track the amount of revenues released and incentives received for each eligible project under each tax incentive agreement and shall provide the authority the information upon request.

By November 1 of each year, the authority and the department shall jointly prepare an annual report and post it to the Cabinet for Economic Development Web site as required in KRS 154.12-2035. The report shall include a list of all companies with which tax incentive agreements have been entered into and a summary of the terms of each agreement, including the type of facility approved, product to be produced, estimated output upon completion, required minimum capital investment and maximum recovery, incentives approved by type of tax and amount, activation date, and termination date.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5, effective August 30, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 202, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 134, § 8, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 199, § 25, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 29, § 57, effective July 14, 2018.

154.27-060.
Severance tax incentives.

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 134.580 or KRS Chapter 143, an approved company that purchases or severs coal that:
(1) (a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 134.580 or KRS Chapter 143, an approved company that purchases or severs coal that:

Is subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143.020; and

Is used by the approved company exclusively as feedstock for an alternative fuel facility, energy-efficient alternative fuel facility, or a gasification facility;

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 134.580 or KRS Chapter 143A, an approved company that purchases or severs natural gas or natural gas liquids on or after August 1, 2010, that:

Is subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143A.020; and

Is used by the approved company exclusively as feedstock for an alternative fuel facility described in KRS 154.27-020(4)(d);

An approved company that has purchased or severed coal subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143.020 or purchased or severed natural gas or natural gas liquids subject to the tax imposed under KRS 143A.020 prior to the execution of a tax incentive agreement shall not create an affiliate, subsidiary, corporation, or other related entity that would result in a base amount of zero (0).

The incentive may be requested beginning in the first calendar year after the construction of a new facility or the upgrade or retrofit of an existing facility is completed.

Upon completion of the construction of a new alternative fuel facility, energy-efficient alternative fuel facility, or gasification facility or the retrofit or upgrade of an existing facility, an approved company shall notify the authority and the department.

The approved company may obtain the incentive on an annual basis by filing a request for the incentive with the department as provided in KRS 143.024.

The department shall notify the authority of the incentives requested and the incentives distributed, upon request of the authority.

may be eligible for an incentive in an amount up to eighty percent (80%) of the taxes paid pursuant to KRS 143.020 on coal purchased or severed by the approved company that is above the base amount.

may be eligible for an incentive in an amount up to eighty percent (80%) of the taxes paid pursuant to KRS 143A.020 on natural gas or natural gas liquids purchased or severed by the approved company that is above the base amount.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6, effective August 30, 2007; 2010, ch. 60, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 139, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018.